Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Article 1. Federal Tax Lien Registration

§§ 29-6-101 through 29-6-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 41, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to federal lien registration, see article 2 of this chapter.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which were derived from Laws 1929, ch. 38, §§ 1 through 7, comprised the Uniform Federal Tax Lien Registration Act.